Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-3008
Digital asset depository account; disclosures to customer; requirements.

The terms and conditions of a customer's digital asset depository account at a digital asset depository shall be disclosed at the time the customer contracts for a digital asset business service. Such disclosure shall be full and complete, contain no material misrepresentations, be in readily understandable language, and shall include, as appropriate and to the extent applicable:

(1) A schedule of fees and charges the digital asset depository may assess, the manner by which fees and charges will be calculated if they are not set in advance and disclosed, and the timing of the fees and charges;

(2) A statement that the customer's digital asset depository account is not protected by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

(3) A statement whether there is support for forked networks of each digital asset;

(4) A statement that investment in digital assets is volatile and subject to market loss;

(5) A statement that investment in digital assets may result in total loss of value;

(6) A statement that legal, legislative, and regulatory changes may impact the value of digital assets;

(7) A statement that customers should perform research before investing in digital assets;

(8) A statement that transfers of digital assets are irrevocable, if applicable;

(9) A statement as to how liability for an unauthorized, mistaken, or accidental transfer shall be apportioned;

(10) A statement that digital assets are not legal tender in any jurisdiction;

(11) A statement that digital assets may be subject to cyber theft or theft and become unrecoverable;

(12) A statement about who maintains control, ownership, and access to any private key related to a digital assets customer's digital asset account; and

(13) A statement that losing private key information may result in permanent total loss of access to digital assets.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 8;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 24.